Washington statutes.
RCW 19.27.740

Building owner—Violations—Penalties.

(1) If a building owner has not complied with the testing schedule under RCW 19.27.710, or has not received a certificate of compliance within one hundred twenty days of an inspection under *RCW 19.27.730 that revealed a deficiency, then the building owner has committed a violation and may be issued a citation by the local authority. A violation of this section is a civil infraction, subject to all applicable local fees and other remedies for noncompliance. The monetary penalties in subsection (3) of this section apply when other penalties are not required by the local authority having jurisdiction.

(2) The authority having jurisdiction may require the building owner to conspicuously post the citation at all pedestrian entrances and exits until a certificate of compliance has been issued pursuant to RCW 19.27.720 or the citation has been dismissed.

(3) After the issuance of an initial citation, additional citations may be issued if the violations are not corrected:

(a) If the violations are not corrected within one hundred twenty days of the initial citation, a second citation may be issued with a monetary penalty of five cents per square foot of occupied space;

(b) If the violations are not corrected within two hundred forty days of the initial citation, a third citation may be issued with an additional monetary penalty of ten cents per square foot of occupied space and shall require mandatory in-person attendance by the building's head facilities manager at a four-hour fire life safety course given by the international certification board or equivalent provider of fire life safety programs accredited by the American national standards institute; and

(c) After the issuance of a citation pursuant to (b) of this subsection, additional citations may be issued every sixty days until any and all prior violations are resolved and all penalties imposed are satisfied. Each citation issued under this subsection (3)(c) shall assess a penalty of ten cents per square foot of occupied space.

(4) Revenue from the penalties in subsection (2) [(3)] of this section shall be forwarded to the state treasurer for deposit in the fire service training account under RCW 43.43.944.

[ 2020 c 88 s 5.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The reference to RCW 19.27.730 appears to be erroneous. RCW 19.27.720 was apparently intended.

Effective date—2020 c 88: See note following RCW 19.27.700.